apertium-es-gl.gl.dix
<pardef n="s/ubir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ubiriamos</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiriámo</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiriámos</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiriámo</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiría</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiría</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__habería"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiriades</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiriáde</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiriádes</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirías</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiría</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirías</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirían</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirían</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiría</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiría</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiremos</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirémo</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirémos</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirémo</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirei</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirei</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiréi</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiredes</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiréde</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirédes</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirás</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubira</l>     <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiras</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirás</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirán</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiran</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirán</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirá</l>     <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubira</l>     <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirá</l>     <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirmos</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubírmo</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubírmos</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubírmo</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubir</l>      <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubi</l>       <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubir</l>      <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubír</l>      <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubirdes</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubírde</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubírdes</l>   <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubires</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíre</l>     <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíres</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubiren</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíren</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubir</l>      <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubi</l>       <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubir</l>      <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubír</l>      <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubindo</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndo</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndomos</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndomo</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndomos</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndomo</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndodes</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndode</l>  <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubíndodes</l> <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubimos</l>    <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ubímo</l>     <r>ubir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>

<e lm="subir"><i>s</i><par n="s/ubir__vblex"/></e>
